District of Columbia statutes.
49-1101.04

Applicability.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, this compact shall apply to the children of:

(1)

Active duty members of the uniformed services;

(2)

Members or veterans of the uniformed services who are severely injured and medically discharged or retired for a period of one year after medical discharge or retirement; and

(3)

Members of the uniformed services who have died on active duty or as a result of injuries sustained on active duty for a period of one year after death.

(b)

The provisions of this compact shall only apply to local education agencies as defined in this compact.

(c)

The provisions of this compact shall not apply to the children of:

(1)

Inactive members of the National Guard and military reserves;

(2)

Members of the uniformed services now retired, except as provided in subsection (a) of this section;

(3)

Veterans of the uniformed services, except as provided in subsection (a) of this section; or

(4)

Other U.S. Department of Defense personnel and other federal agency civilian and contract employees not defined as active duty members of the uniformed services.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-304, § 5, 60 DCR 2717